Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS LEGISLATIVE STUDY GROUP.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A legislative study group is established to study graduation requirements related to credits. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Members. new text end new text begin (a) The legislative study group on graduation credit requirements consists of: new text end new text begin (1) four duly elected and currently serving members of the house of representatives, two appointed by the speaker of the house and two appointed by the house minority leader; and new text end new text begin (2) four duly elected and currently serving senators, two appointed by the senate majority leader and two appointed by the senate minority leader. new text end new text begin (b) The appointments must be made by June 15, 2025, and expire December 31, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) If a vacancy occurs, the leader of the caucus in the house of representatives or senate to which the vacating study group member belonged must fill the vacancy. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The legislative study group must study and evaluate current graduation credit requirements and recommend changes. In preparing the recommendations, the group must consider: new text end new text begin (1) current statutory requirements relating to graduation requirements, including statewide standards; new text end new text begin (2) flexible ways students can demonstrate career and college readiness; new text end new text begin (3) teacher licensure requirements related to how courses may be counted for credit; and new text end new text begin (4) alignment between graduation requirements and Minnesota's workforce needs. new text end new text begin (b) The study group must identify and include in its final report any statutory changes needed to implement the study group recommendations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings and chair. new text end new text begin (a) The speaker of the house must designate a member to convene the first meeting of the study group, which must be held no later than July 15, 2025. Members of the study group must elect a chair from among the members present at the first meeting. The study group must meet periodically. new text end new text begin (b) Meetings of the study group are subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 3.055. The meetings may be conducted by interactive technology. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administrative support. new text end new text begin The Department of Education must cooperate with the legislative study group and provide information requested in a timely fashion. The Legislative Coordinating Commission must provide meeting space, technical and administrative support, and staff support for the study group. The study group may hold meetings in any publicly accessible location in the Capitol complex that is equipped with technology that can facilitate remote testimony. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Consultation with stakeholders. new text end new text begin In making recommendations, the study group must consult with interested and affected stakeholders. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin The study group must submit a preliminary report with its recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education by December 15, 2025, and a final report by December 31, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The study group expires December 31, 2026, or on the date upon which the final report required under subdivision 7 is submitted to the legislature, whichever is later. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS LEGISLATIVE STUDY GROUP.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Graduation requirements legislative study group. new text end new text begin (a) For transfer to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the graduation requirements legislative study group: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 64,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 64,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end